Hawaii statutes.
§340B-3 Certification. (a) Upon board
approval the director shall issue certificates entitling qualified individuals
to operate wastewater treatment plants. Each certificate shall indicate the
class of wastewater treatment plant for which the individual is qualified.

(b) The director shall issue a certificate to
each applicant who, on June 2, 1978, holds a valid certificate issued to
the applicant pursuant to the voluntary program, conducted by the Hawaii water
pollution control association for certification of operators of wastewater
treatment plants in this State; provided that such applicant files an
application with the director.

(c) The director may issue a certificate,
without requiring a qualifying examination therefor, to an applicant who is an
operator satisfactorily operating a wastewater treatment plant on June 2,
1978; provided that such certificate shall be valid only for the operation of
that wastewater treatment plant or a similar wastewater treatment plant. [L
1978, c 169, pt of §2; am L 1979, c 72, §1; gen ch 1985]

Revision Note

"June 2, 1978" substituted for "the
effective date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next